District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.06

Garage keeper to report cars damaged in accidents.

The individual in charge of any garage or repair shop to which is brought any motor vehicle which shows evidence of having been involved in an accident or struck by bullets shall report to a police station within 24 hours after such motor vehicle is received, giving the make of the motor vehicle, the engine number, the registry number, and the name and address of the owner or operator of such motor vehicle. Any such individual failing so to report shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than $25 nor more than $100 for each offense.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1125, ch. 443, § 12
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 7, 29 DCR 3138
1981 Ed., § 40-719.
1973 Ed., § 40-611.
Definitions applicable: For definitions applicable in this section, see § 50-2201.02.